Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-308
Reorganization; transfer of property; how effected.

If a city of the second class reorganizes as a village pursuant to section 17-306, the village board of trustees shall, at the expiration of sixty days from such election, enter upon the duties of their offices; and all books, papers, records, money, and property of such city shall be delivered over to the village board of trustees; and the authority of the city council and all city officers shall cease from and after the taking effect of village government in such city.

Laws 1879, § 54, p. 206;

R.S.1913, § 5078;

C.S.1922, § 4250;

C.S.1929, § 17-302;

R.S.1943, § 17-308;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 100.